Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1392.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 17509(a)(1) of Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, added May 9, 2024 (P.L.50, No.14), is amended to read:§ 17509. Hotel room rental tax in second class and second class A counties.(a) Imposition of excise tax.--The following shall apply:(1) [The] Except as provided under section 17741(a) (relating to increase in rate of hotel tax), the county commissioners in each county of the second class are authorized to impose an excise tax at 5% on the consideration received by each operator of a hotel within the county from each transaction of renting a room or rooms to accommodate 1234567891011121314151617181920 transients.* * *Section 2. Title 16 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 177DOWNTOWN PITTSBURGH REVITALIZATION INITIATIVESubchapterA. Preliminary Provisions B. Downtown Development AuthorityC. Bonds and Funds of AuthorityD. Increase in Hotel TaxE. Downtown Revitalization FundSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.17711. Scope of chapter.17712. Findings and declaration of policy.17713. Definitions.§ 17711. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the downtown Pittsburgh revitalization initiative.§ 17712. Findings and declaration of policy.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds the following:(1) The health, safety and general welfare of the residents, visitors and employees of downtown Pittsburgh are directly dependent upon the continual encouragement, development, growth and expansion of business, industry, commerce and tourism within that area.(2) Blight in downtown Pittsburgh can be avoided by the promotion, attraction, stimulation, development and expansion of business, industry, commerce and tourism in that area.20260SB1392PN1851 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Supplemental sources of revenue are needed by municipalities within Allegheny County to invest in facilities that will promote economic development and tourism and improve the quality of life of their residents.(4) Supplemental sources of public and private revenue are required to improve and develop the area's existing economy and to develop new civic, convention, cultural, hospitality, tourism and recreational facilities.(5) Local government in downtown Pittsburgh lacks adequate resources to maintain, improve and modernize the area's civic, convention, cultural, hospitality, tourism and recreational facilities, the continued availability of which is vital to the economic growth and development of downtown Pittsburgh, to the ability of the area to compete globally for visitors and to enhance the health, welfare, education and quality of life of the residents, visitors and employees of the area.(6) Collaborative efforts are needed among leaders within the City of Pittsburgh, Allegheny County, civic organizations and corporate organizations to identify and prioritize projects to improve and develop the area's existing economy and to develop new civic, convention, cultural, hospitality, tourism and recreational facilities.(b) Declaration.--It is declared to be the public policy of the Commonwealth to promote the health, welfare and quality of life of the residents, visitors and employees of downtown Pittsburgh and to enhance economic development and employment in that region by supporting the construction of downtown destination projects and other central city growth projects for the public purpose of promoting, attracting, stimulating, 20260SB1392PN1851 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 developing and expanding business, industry, commerce and tourism. That purpose is declared to be a public purpose supporting the enactment of all of the provisions of this chapter and for which public money may be spent, taxes may be imposed and private property may be acquired by the exercise of the power of eminent domain.§ 17713. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Auditorium authority." The authority created to operate the convention center under the act of July 29, 1953 (P.L.1034, No.270), known as the Public Auditorium Authorities Law."Authority." The Downtown Development Authority established under section 17721 (relating to authority established)."Board." The governing body of the authority established under section 17722 (relating to board of authority)."Central city." A city of the second class located in a county of the second class."Central county." A county of the second class."Conference." The Allegheny County Conference on Community Development, or any successor entity."Convention center." The real property described as the tract of land, with the structures, facilities, buildings, fixtures and improvements erected on the tract, situate in the central city of the central county, and known as the David L. Lawrence Convention Center, together with the structures, facilities, buildings, fixtures and improvements located on the property."Downtown destination project." A public infrastructure or 20260SB1392PN1851 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 economic development project of a significant nature related to civic, convention, cultural, hospitality, tourism and recreational facilities located within the primary investment area."Fund." The Downtown Revitalization Fund established under section 17751 (relating to establishment of Downtown Revitalization Fund)."Primary investment area." The area encompassing census tract 201, also known as the central business district within the central city, which shall include the entirety of the convention center and realty appurtenant thereto, and the portion of census tract 203, also known as the strip district within the central city, between Penn Avenue and the Allegheny River from 11th Street to 15th Street, and the portion of census tract 305, also known as the lower hill district within the central city, comprised of the intersection of Bigelow Boulevard and Chatham Square continuing in a northeasterly direction along Bigelow Boulevard to Washington Place where it becomes Bedford Avenue; and continuing on a northeasterly direction along Bedford Avenue until it reaches Crawford Street; proceeding southeasterly along Crawford Street until it reaches Centre Avenue; proceeding southwesterly along Centre Avenue until it reaches Chatham Square; and continuing northwesterly along Chatham Square until it reaches the point of origin at Bigelow Boulevard, and shall include any successor identification mechanisms for the census tracts and street names described herein.SUBCHAPTER BDOWNTOWN DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITYSec.20260SB1392PN1851 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 17721. Authority established.17722. Board of authority.17723. Purposes and powers.17724. Fiscal matters.17725. Operating budget.17726. Restrictions upon activities of board members and employees.17727. Exemption from taxation.§ 17721. Authority established.(a) Establishment.--A body corporate and politic to be known as the Downtown Development Authority is established as a special purpose areawide unit of local government under section 7 of Article IX of the Constitution of Pennsylvania exercising powers as a unit of local government under this chapter and having territorial limits that encompass the geographic areas of the primary investment area. The exercise by the authority of the powers conferred by this chapter is the performance of an essential public function.(b) Time.--The authority shall be established as soon as practicable after the effective date of this subsection. Once established, the authority shall continue in existence perpetually.(c) Sovereign immunity.--(1) The authority and its board members, officers and employees shall have sovereign immunity as provided in 1 Pa.C.S. § 2310 (relating to sovereign immunity reaffirmed; specific waiver).(2) The authority and its board members, officers and employees shall remain immune from suit except as provided by and subject to 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 85 Subchs. A (relating to 20260SB1392PN1851 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 general provisions) and B (relating to actions against Commonwealth parties).(3) Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 8525 (relating to legal assistance), the authority, through the authority's legal counsel, shall defend actions brought against the authority or its board members, officers and employees when acting within the scope of their official duties.(d) Liability.--Members of the board may not be held personally liable for the bonds or other obligations of the authority. Any rights of creditors shall be solely against the authority.§ 17722. Board of authority.(a) Power of board.--The powers of the authority shall be exercised by a board having full authority to manage the properties and business of the authority and to prescribe, amend and repeal bylaws, rules and regulations governing the manner in which the business of the authority may be conducted and the powers given to the authority may be exercised. All bylaws, rules and regulations and amendments of the bylaws, rules and regulations shall be filed with the secretary of the authority.(b) Membership.--The board shall consist of the following members:(1) One member appointed by the county executive of the central county.(2) One member appointed by the mayor of the central city.(3) One member appointed by the governing body of the auditorium authority to represent that authority.(4) One member appointed by the county executive of the central county from a list of names presented by the 20260SB1392PN1851 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conference. The appointee must be a member of the conference.(5) One member appointed by the mayor of the central city from a list of names presented by the conference. The appointee must be a member of the conference.(c) Member terms.--(1) The term of office of a member of the board appointed:(i) under subsection (b)(1), (2) and (3) shall be five years; and(ii) under subsection (b)(4) and (5) shall be four years.(2) The term of office of a member shall begin on the date of appointment. A member may hold office until a successor has been appointed and qualified or until death or resignation.(3) An individual may not serve more than two consecutive full terms on the board.(4) An individual appointed to the board when a vacancy occurs during the term of office of a member of the board shall serve for the remainder of the term. Vacancies shall be filled within 90 days.(d) Officers.--The initial members of the board shall select one of the board's initial members as the interim chairperson of the authority and shall, within 10 days of the establishment of the authority, set a date, time and place for the initial organizational meeting of the board. The members shall elect a chairperson, vice chairperson, secretary, treasurer and another officer as deemed necessary by majority vote of the board. A member may not hold more than one office of the board at any time. Members may serve successive terms as officers of the 20260SB1392PN1851 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board.(e) Meetings.--(1) The board shall meet as frequently as the board deems appropriate, but at least once per month during the first year that the authority is in existence and thereafter at least once during each quarter of the authority's fiscal year.(2) In addition to the required meetings under paragraph (1), a meeting of the board shall be called by the chairperson if a request for a meeting is submitted to the chairperson by at least two members of the board. A majority of the members of the board in office shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting the business of the board and for all other purposes. The acts of a majority of the members of the board taken at a meeting of the board at which a quorum is present shall be the acts of the board.§ 17723. Purposes and powers.(a) Purposes.--The purpose of the authority includes, but is not limited to, the following:(1) Supporting and financing the construction of downtown destination projects.(2) Ensuring the efficient and effective development of downtown destination projects.(3) Supporting and financing the construction of other economic development projects.(b) Powers.--Subject to the limitations under subsection (d), the authority is granted all powers necessary or convenient to carry out the authority's purposes, including to:(1) Have continuing succession.(2) Sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, complain 20260SB1392PN1851 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and defend in all courts.(3) Adopt, use and alter at will a corporate seal.(4) Acquire by gift or otherwise, purchase, hold, receive, lease, sublease and use any license, franchise or property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein, including a downtown destination project or parts of the downtown destination project.(5) Sell, transfer or dispose of any property or interest therein for adequate and fair consideration.(6) Acquire, hold, develop, construct, maintain, manage, operate, repair, own, lease or sublease a downtown destination project or parts of the downtown destination project funded from the fund.(7) Make, enter into and award contracts with any person for the development, financing, construction, maintenance, operation and repair of downtown destination projects or parts of the downtown destination projects funded from the fund.(8) Conduct financial and performance reviews and audits of downtown destination projects funded from the fund.(9) Conduct long-term planning necessary for the efficient and effective operation and development of downtown destination projects funded from the fund.(10) Make bylaws for the regulation of the authority's affairs and promulgate rules, regulations and policies in connection with the performance of the authority's functions and duties.(11) (i) Borrow money for the purpose of paying the costs of any project and to evidence such borrowing in any customary and appropriate fashion.20260SB1392PN1851 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Make and issue taxable or tax-exempt negotiable bonds of the authority and secure the payment of the bonds or any part of the bonds by pledge or deed of trust of all or any of its revenues, rentals, receipts and contract rights.(iii) Make agreements with the purchasers or holders of the bonds or with other obligees of the authority in connection with any bonds, whether issued or to be issued, as the authority shall deem advisable, which agreements shall constitute contracts with the holders or purchasers.(iv) Obtain credit enhancement or liquidity facilities in connection with any bonds as the authority shall determine to be advantageous.(v) Provide, in general, for the security for the bonds and for the rights of the holders of the bonds.(12) Make, enter into and award contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient for the carrying out of its business.(13) Borrow money and accept grants and enter into contracts, leases, subleases, licenses or other transactions with any Federal agency, State public body, political subdivision, association, partnership, corporation or private person.(14) Mortgage, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise encumber any of the authority's property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, and its revenues or receipts, including any tax revenues or interest the authority may have in any lease or sublease of downtown destination projects or parts of downtown destination projects.20260SB1392PN1851 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (15) Procure insurance containing coverage, including, without limitation, insurance covering the timely payment in full of principal and interest on bonds of the authority, in the amounts and from the insurers the authority may determine to be necessary or desirable for its purposes.(16) Invest authority money.(17) Cooperate with any Federal agency, State public body or political subdivision.(18) Invest money not required for immediate disbursement in reserve or sinking funds.(19) Appoint all officers, agents and employees required for the performance of the authority's duties and fix and determine their qualifications, duties and compensation and to retain or employ other agents or consultants.(20) Enter into contracts of group insurance for the benefit of the authority's employees and to set up a retirement or pension fund for employees.(21) Appoint and fix the compensation of chief counsel and assistant counsel, who may not be required to be employees of the authority, to provide it with legal assistance. Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 8525 (relating to legal assistance), the authority through its counsel shall defend actions brought against the authority and its officers and employees when acting within the scope of their official duties.(22) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient for the promotion of the authority's purposes and the general welfare of the authority and to carry out the powers granted to the authority under this chapter or any other law.(c) Eminent domain.--The authority, upon making a finding 20260SB1392PN1851 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that it is necessary or convenient to acquire any real or personal property in the central city for immediate or future use for purposes related to the construction of downtown destination projects or related developments, may acquire property by the exercise of the power of eminent domain under 26 Pa.C.S. (relating to eminent domain), and for those purposes shall have the power of eminent domain. The authority may use the authority's eminent domain power to acquire property already devoted to a public use, except that the power may not be used to acquire property owned or used by the Commonwealth.(d) Operations.--Notwithstanding any purpose of the authority or a general or specific power granted by this chapter or any other law, whether express or implied, the following limitations and conditions shall apply to the operations of the authority:(1) The authority shall have no power to pledge the credit or taxing powers of the Commonwealth or any other government agency, except the credit of the authority, nor shall any of the bonds of the authority be deemed a debt or liability of the Commonwealth or of any other government agency, except as otherwise agreed by the Commonwealth or a government agency.(2) Neither the Commonwealth nor any government agency, except the authority, shall be liable for payment of the principal or maturity value of or interest or premium on any of the bonds of the authority, except as otherwise agreed by the Commonwealth or a government agency.(3) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or any other act to the contrary or of any implication that may be drawn from this chapter or any other law, the Commonwealth 20260SB1392PN1851 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and all other government agencies, except the authority, shall have no legal or moral obligation for the payment of any expenses or obligations of the authority, including, but not limited to, bond principal and interest, the funding or refunding of any reserve and any administrative or operating expenses whatsoever, except as otherwise agreed to by the Commonwealth or another government agency.(4) Bonds of the authority shall contain a prominent statement of the limitations provided in this subsection and a further statement to the effect that obligees of the authority shall have no recourse, either legal or moral, to the Commonwealth or to any other government agency for payment of the bonds, except as otherwise agreed to by the Commonwealth or another government agency.(5) The authority may not assume the responsibility of employing personnel directly engaged in the operation of downtown destination projects but may enter into contracts for the operation, maintenance and ongoing improvement of those facilities with public and private organizations that have expertise in operating the type of facility involved.§ 17724. Fiscal matters.(a) Payment of money.--All money of the authority, from whatever source derived, shall be paid to the treasurer of the board, which shall be:(1) deposited in the first instance by the treasurer in one or more banks or trust companies, in one or more special accounts; and(2) paid out on the warrant or other order of the chairperson of the board or of another person or persons as the board may authorize to execute warrants or orders, except 20260SB1392PN1851 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the money in the fund, which shall be disbursed in accordance with section 17751 (relating to establishment of Downtown Revitalization Fund).(b) Fiscal year.--The fiscal year of the authority shall commence on January 1 of each year and end on December 31 of the year, except as otherwise provided by the board.(c) Audit.--The board shall provide for an annual audit of the authority by an independent certified public accounting firm. A copy of the annual audit shall be provided to the central city and the central county.§ 17725. Operating budget.(a) Preparation, submission and adoption.--At least 90 days before commencement of the ensuing fiscal year of the authority, a recommended operating budget shall be prepared and submitted to the board. The operating budget shall include the estimated receipts and revenues of the authority during the next fiscal year. The operating budget for the next fiscal year shall be adopted by the board at least 30 days before the end of the current fiscal year.(b) Expenses.--The money necessary to pay the administrative expenses of the authority during each fiscal year may be drawn from the fund.§ 17726. Restrictions upon activities of board members and employees.The provisions of 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure) shall apply to board members, officers and employees of the authority. For the purposes of 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 11, employees of the authority shall be regarded as public employees of the Commonwealth and officers or board members of the authority shall be regarded as public 20260SB1392PN1851 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 officials of the Commonwealth, regardless of whether the employees receive compensation. The authority shall also be subject to 65 Pa.C.S. (relating to public officers) and the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, relating to the inspection and copying of public records.§ 17727. Exemption from taxation.The effectuation of the authorized purpose of the authority shall be exclusively for the benefit of the residents of this Commonwealth, the increase of commerce and prosperity and the improvement of health and living conditions. The authority may not be required to pay taxes or assessments upon any property acquired or used by the authority for the purposes under this chapter, and the bonds issued by the authority and the interest and income related to the bonds shall be free from State and local taxation.SUBCHAPTER CBONDS AND FUNDS OF AUTHORITYSec.17731. Bonds.17732. Governmental immunity.17733. Transfer of money.§ 17731. Bonds.The authority may issue bonds, sell bonds, use net proceeds of bond sales, refund bonds, adopt pledges, mortgages, covenants, indentures and trusts, exercise remedies and confer additional remedies upon persons holding bonds in the same manner as provided under the act of July 29, 1953 (P.L.1034, No.270), known as the Public Auditorium Authorities Law.§ 17732. Governmental immunity.Except as provided by and subject to 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 85 20260SB1392PN1851 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Subchs. A (relating to general provisions) and C (relating to actions against local parties), the authority and the authority's officers, officials and employees shall have governmental immunity.§ 17733. Transfer of money.(a) Transfer.--The Commonwealth, the central city or the central county may:(1) make grants from current and future revenues to the authority and to assist in defraying the costs of managing, operating, maintaining, financing and servicing the debt of downtown destination projects or parts of downtown destination projects, to enter into certain credit enhancements or liquidity facilities relating to the debt of downtown destination projects or parts of downtown destination projects, to enter into long-term agreements providing for payment of the costs and to enter into long-term leases or subleases as lessee or sublessee of all or part of a downtown destination project; and(2) issue bonds for the purpose of obtaining money for the acquisition or improvement of downtown destination projects or parts of downtown destination projects.(b) Contributions.--The Commonwealth may contribute to the capital costs of constructing downtown destination projects by the issuance of Commonwealth bonds and notes under Article XIX-B of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971. A project undertaken by the authority is deemed to be a redevelopment assistance project under which capital money of the Commonwealth may be expended under the act of May 20, 1949 (P.L.1633, No.493), known as the Housing and Redevelopment Assistance Law, and, notwithstanding the 20260SB1392PN1851 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provisions of the Housing and Redevelopment Assistance Law, the Department of Community and Economic Development may make capital grants directly to the authority.SUBCHAPTER DINCREASE IN HOTEL TAXSec.17741. Increase in rate of hotel tax. § 17741. Increase in rate of hotel tax.(a) Increase.--The rate of the tax imposed under section 17509(a) (relating to hotel room rental tax in second class and second class A counties) in the central county shall be increased as follows on rentals of a room or rooms to accommodate transients:(1) to 2% from the effective date of this paragraph through August 31, 2027; and(2) to 4% beginning September 1, 2027.(b) Distribution of revenues.--The incremental additional revenues received from the tax increase under this section shall be distributed as follows:(1) Thirty-three percent of the additional tax revenues collected by hotels located within a municipality other than the central city that at the time receives revenues under section 17509(b) shall be returned to that municipality and otherwise handled in the same fashion as if the incremental additional revenues returned to the municipality under this paragraph were part of the base revenues disbursed to it under that section.(2) To the trustee for any bonds issued by the authority, in accordance with the provisions of the indenture or indentures pursuant to which the bonds are issued, to be 20260SB1392PN1851 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 used for the payment of debt service on the bonds and other amounts payable in connection with the bonds.(3) (i) To the extent funds are available, 15% of the revenue received by the county from the excise tax shall be distributed to a tourist promotion agency pursuant to section 2199.14 of the act of July 28, 1953 (P.L.723, No.230), known as the Second Class County Code.(ii) To the payment of all amounts set forth in paragraph (4):(A) in full; or(B) if the revenues are insufficient to make the payment in full, on a pro rata basis.(4) To the extent funds are available, 15% of the revenue received by the county from the excise tax shall be deposited by the treasurer of the central county with the treasurer of the auditorium authority for:(i) expanding and improving the convention center or exhibition hall and realty appurtenant to the premises; and(ii) operational and maintenance expenditures of the convention center or exhibition hall, each as provided in section 17509(d).(5) To the extent funds are available, 15% of the revenue from the tax received by the county shall be used for:(i) operational and maintenance expenditures of the convention center or exhibition hall as provided in section 17509(d);(ii) regional tourist promotion activities; or(iii) an administrative fee for collecting the tax.20260SB1392PN1851 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) To the extent funds are available, all remaining revenue from the tax received by the county shall be deposited by the treasurer of the central county into the fund.(c) Definitions.--Terms used in this section that are not otherwise defined in this chapter but are defined in section 17509 shall have the meanings ascribed to them in that section.SUBCHAPTER EDOWNTOWN REVITALIZATION FUNDSec.17751. Establishment of Downtown Revitalization Fund. 17752. Use of money in the fund.§ 17751. Establishment of Downtown Revitalization Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Downtown Revitalization Fund is established by the authority. The treasurer of the board shall be custodian of the fund, which shall be subject to the provisions of law applicable to funds listed in section 302 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.(b) Appropriation.--Money in the fund is appropriated to the authority on a continuing basis and shall be used exclusively as provided in this chapter.(c) Collection and deposit.--The treasurer of each central county is directed to collect the tax imposed under Subchapter D (relating to increase in hotel tax) and to deposit the revenue received from the tax into the fund.(d) Interest earnings.--Pending disbursement, money received on behalf of or deposited into the fund may be invested or reinvested. All earnings received from the investment or reinvestment of the money shall be credited to the fund.20260SB1392PN1851 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 17752. Use of money in the fund.(a) Use.--Money in the fund shall be used by the authority to fund the capital costs of downtown destination projects.(b) Limitations.--Expenditures from the fund for an eligible downtown destination project shall be subject to the following limitations:(1) The funding provided from the fund for an eligible downtown destination project may not exceed 75% of the total cost of the downtown destination project.(2) No money may be expended from the fund for operating costs of any downtown destination project or facility.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1392PN1851 - 21 - 123456789101112